Utah statutes.
10-6-157.   Director of finance in certain cities.
The governing body of a city of the third, fourth, or fifth class may, and the
cities under an optional form of city government shall, by resolution or
ordinance, create a director of finance position to perform the financial
duties and responsibilities of the city recorder in third, fourth, and fifth
class cities or the city auditor in first and second class cities, as
established by this chapter.  The director of finance shall be a qualified
person appointed and removed with the advice and consent of the governing
body, and may not assume the duties of the city treasurer.  The governing body
may also adopt the financial administrative duties of the director of finance
prescribed in the Uniform Accounting Manual for Utah Cities.
